Utah statutes.
31A-8a-205.5.   Free look right.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person that purchases a health discount program may, with or without cause, within 30 days after the day on which the purchase contract is signed, cancel the contract without payment, damages, penalty, or liability of any kind by giving written notice of cancellation to the other party to the contract.

(2)  A person may not exercise the right of cancellation described in Subsection (1) if the person has used the services of the health discount program under the contract.

(3)  If a person cancels a contract under Subsection (1), the other party to the contract shall refund all money and other consideration paid in relation to the health discount program, less a maximum of $25 of any enrollment charge, regardless of whether the enrollment charge was designated as nonrefundable.



Enacted by Chapter 135, 2013 General Session

